Alabama, session 2026rs, SB16.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. For the period commencing on October 1
2026, and ending on September 30, 2029, Sleep in Heavenly
Peace, Inc. is exempt from paying state sales and use taxes.
(b) Sleep in Heavenly Peace, Inc. may be exempted from
paying county and municipal sales and use taxes upon approval
of the county or municipality pursuant to Section 40-23-4.01.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
SB16 Engrossed


Senate
Read for the first time and referred ................13-Jan-26
to the Senate committee on Finance
and Taxation Education

Read for the second time and placed ................29-Jan-26
on the calendar:
2 amendments

Read for the third time and passed ................10-Feb-26
as amended
Yeas 32
Nays 0
Abstains 0


Patrick Harris,
Secretary.

Page 2